apertium-es-gl.gl.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
	Dictionary:
	Sections: 2
	Entries: 29930
	Sdefs: 66
	Paradigms: 333
	Last processed by: apertium-dixtools sort -alignBidix ../apertium-es-gl/apertium-es-gl.gl.dix ../apertium-es-gl/apertium-es-gl.gl.dix

-->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ÀÃÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÕÖÙÚÛÜàáâãäçèéêëìíîïñòõóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="acr" /> 
    <sdef n="predet" /> 
    <sdef n="detnt" /> 
    <sdef n="loc" /> 
    <sdef n="ant" /> 
    <sdef n="al" /> 
    <sdef n="atn" /> 
    <sdef n="enc" /> 
    <sdef n="pro" /> 
    <sdef n="tn" /> 
    <sdef n="n" /> 
    <sdef n="np" /> 
    <sdef n="adj" /> 
    <sdef n="f" /> 
    <sdef n="m" /> 
    <sdef n="mf" /> 
    <sdef n="sg" /> 
    <sdef n="pl" /> 
    <sdef n="adv" /> 
    <sdef n="preadv" /> 
    <sdef n="pr" /> 
    <sdef n="prn" /> 
    <sdef n="rel" /> 
    <sdef n="nn" /> 
    <sdef n="an" /> 
    <sdef n="ind" /> 
    <sdef n="itg" /> 
    <sdef n="det" /> 
    <sdef n="dem" /> 
    <sdef n="def" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjsub" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjadv" /> 
    <sdef n="nt" /> 
    <sdef n="vbser" /> 
    <sdef n="vbhaver" /> 
    <sdef n="vblex" /> 
    <sdef n="inf" /> 
    <sdef n="infps" /> 
    <sdef n="ger" /> 
    <sdef n="gerps" /> 
    <sdef n="pp" /> 
    <sdef n="pri" /> 
    <sdef n="p1" /> 
    <sdef n="p2" /> 
    <sdef n="p3" /> 
    <sdef n="pii" /> 
    <sdef n="pmp" /> 
    <sdef n="ifi" /> 
    <sdef n="fti" /> 
    <sdef n="cni" /> 
    <sdef n="prs" /> 
    <sdef n="pis" /> 
    <sdef n="fts" /> 
    <sdef n="imp" /> 
    <sdef n="pos" /> 
    <sdef n="sp" /> 
    <sdef n="ref" /> 
    <sdef n="sup" /> 
    <sdef n="num" /> 
    <sdef n="ij" /> 
    <sdef n="sent" /> 
    <sdef n="cm" /> 
    <sdef n="lpar" /> 
    <sdef n="rpar" /> 
    <sdef n="lquest" /> 
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
<pardef n="numeros">
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?(%)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="emails">
  <e>       <re>[a-z.ÀÃÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÕÖÙÚÛÜàáâãäçèéêëìíîïñòõóôöùúûü]+@[a-z\-.ÀÃÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÕÖÙÚÛÜàáâãäçèéêëìíîïñòõóôöùúûü]+[a-z\-ÀÃÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÕÖÙÚÛÜàáâãäçèéêëìíîïñòõóôöùúûü]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="urls">
  <e>       <re>((http://)([a-z\-ÀÃÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÕÖÙÚÛÜàáâãäçèéêëìíîïñòõóôöùúûü]+[.])+[a-zÀÃÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÕÖÙÚÛÜàáâãäçèéêëìíîïñòõóôöùúûü]+)</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="urls2">
  <e>       <re>((www.)([a-z\-ÀÃÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÕÖÙÚÛÜàáâãäçèéêëìíîïñòõóôöùúûü]+[.])+[a-zÀÃÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÕÖÙÚÛÜàáâãäçèéêëìíîïñòõóôöùúûü]+)</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="separa">
  <e>       <re>[.\?;:!@]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="coma">
  <e>       <re>,</re><p><l></l><r><s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="separ">
  <e>       <re>[¿¡]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lquest"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="paresq">
  <e>       <re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="pardret">
  <e>       <re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="S__haberiámo">
  <e>       <p><l>-las</l>      <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-la</l>       <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-los</l>      <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-lo</l>       <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>las</l>       <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>la</l>        <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>los</l>       <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lo</l>        <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="S__haberiámosch">
  <e>       <p><l>as</l>        <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>os</l>        <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="S__haberiámosme">
  <e>       <p><l>lle</l>       <r>lle<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>vos</l>       <r>vos<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lles</l>      <r>lle<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="S__haberiámoste">
  <e>       <p><l>me</l>        <r>me<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lle</l>       <r>lle<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nos</l>       <r>nos<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lles</l>      <r>lle<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="S__haberiámosche">
  <e>       <p><l>me</l>        <r>me<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lle</l>       <r>lle<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nos</l>       <r>nos<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>vos</l>       <r>vos<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lles</l>      <r>lle<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="S__haberiámoslle">
  <e>       <p><l>me</l>        <r>me<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nos</l>       <r>nos<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>vos</l>       <r>vos<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="S__haberiámosnos">
  <e>       <p><l>lle</l>       <r>lle<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>vos</l>       <r>vos<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lles</l>      <r>lle<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="S__haberiámosvos">
  <e>       <p><l>lle</l>       <r>lle<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nos</l>       <r>nos<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lles</l>      <r>lle<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="S__haberiámoslles">
  <e>       <p><l>nos</l>       <r>nos<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>vos</l>       <r>vos<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="S__haberiámosse">
  <e>       <p><l>me</l>        <r>me<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>che</l>       <r>che<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lle</l>       <r>lle<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nos</l>       <r>nos<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>vos</l>       <r>vos<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lles</l>      <r>lle<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e>       <par n="coma"/></e>
<e>       <par n="emails"/></e>
<e>       <par n="numeros"/></e>
<e>       <par n="pardret"/></e>
<e>       <par n="paresq"/></e>
<e>       <par n="separ"/></e>
<e>       <par n="separa"/></e>
<e>       <par n="urls"/></e>
<e>       <par n="urls2"/></e>
